Utah statutes.
53-8-208.   Counterfeit certificates of inspection.

(1)  A person may not make, issue, or knowingly use any imitation or counterfeit of a safety inspection certificate.

(2)  A person may not present or cause or permit to be presented any safety inspection certificate knowing the certificate to be fictitious, issued for another motor vehicle, or issued without a safety inspection having been made and passed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 26, 1993 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

